Hawaii, session 2026, GM1340.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that,.while the number of
school bus drivers has increased since the governor's August 2,
2024, emergency proclamation relating to school bus services,
the department of education continues to experience a school bus
driver shortage.
The legislature further finds that some school bus
contractors enter into contracts but are later unable to provide
transportation for all contracted routes. Under existing law,
the department of education cannot simply cancel or reassign the
unfulfilled portion of the contract. This leaves students
without access to school transportation.
The purpose of this Act is to provide the department of
education with flexibility to remove or suspend portions of
school bus contracts if the contractor does not provide services
for five or more instructional days, subject to approval by the
superintendent.
2026-3342 HB1785 GDI HMSO
■niiiniiuiniiiiiiiii

Page 2 1785
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
SECTION 2. Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part II, subpart C, to be
appropriately designated and to read as follows:
"§302A- Student transportation contracts; failure to
provide service. (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
when a contractor under a student transportation contract with
the department fails to provide service on a contracted service
capacity or designated service segment for’ five or more
consecutive instructional days, the superintendent may
temporarily suspend or remove the designated service segment or
segments from the contract.
(b) The superintendent may specify conditions and
timelines for, and other limitations on, the suspension or
removal of a contracted service capacity or designated service
segment, as deemed necessary to protect the public interest.
(c) In addition to subsection (a), the superintendent may
enter into an interim agreement with another qualified carrier
to provide transportation for the contracted service capacity or
capacities, or designated service segment or segments.
2026-3342 HB1785 CDl HMSO
iiniiiBiWiiinmininiiii

Page 3 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(dj Any Jmt^rim a^^^ement^e2<ecu±^d£uxsuant t^Ui^
section shall be conducted as an emergency procurement pursuant
to section 103D-307; provided that:
(1) The agreement shall be limited to the scope of the
suspended or removed contracted service capacity or
capacities, or designated service segment or segments;
(2) The agreement shall not exceed twelve months in
duration or the remainder of the school year,
whichever is less; and
(3) The department shall ensure compliance with all
applicable student safety standards.
(e) The department shall complete a competitive
procurement under chapter 1Q3D for a permanent replacement
service within twelve months of executing an interim agreement
under subsection (d).
(f) Pursuant to the remedies for contractor non­
performance established in chapter 103D and applicable
administrative rules, the department may assess a financial
penalty against any contractor that fails to provide service on
a contracted service capacity or designated service segment
without an approved justification. The penalty may be up to one
2026-3342 HB1785 CDl HMSO
wiiniiiiniiiiiiiiiifli

Page 4
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
hundred per cent of the daily contract rate or liquidated
damages equal to the reasonable cost of replacement
transportation services, whichever is 'greater, for each day the
service is unfulfilled. Collected penalties shall be deposited
into the school bus fare revolving fund under section 302A-407.5
and may be expended to offset costs associated with procuring
replacement transportation services.
(g) The suspension or removal of a contracted service
capacity or designated service segment under this section shall
be deemed a termination for default in part pursuant to chapter
103D and applicable administrative rules.
(h) The removal or suspension of a contracted service
capacity or designated service segment under this section, and
the execution of an interim agreement, shall not otherwise
affect the validity or enforceability of the remaining portions
of the contract."
SECTION 3. Section 302A-407.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
"(b) Except as otherwise provided by the legislature,
moneys in the school bus fare revolving fund shall be used

2026-3342 HB1785 CDl HMSO
iMiiiiiiiiniiiHiim

Page 5 H.B. NO. ""
C.D. 1
(1) For school busing services, as authorized by section
302A-406[-r] ; and
(2) To offset costs associated with procuring replacement
services for a student transportation contract under
section 302A-
SECTION 4. All requests for proposals issued by the
department of education for student transportation services, and
all contracts executed by the department of education for
student transportation services, after the effective date of
this Act, shall specifically reference section 302A- , Hawaii
Revised Statutes.
SECTION 5. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 6. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 7. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-3342 HB1785 CDl HMSO

liilllillllilffllllliMIIIII

H.B. NO. 1785
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this Bth day of July , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1785, HD 1,SD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1785, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
108-26